Utah statutes.
59-27-108.   Penalties and interest.

An owner or operator of a sexually explicit business or escort service that fails to comply with this chapter is subject to:

(1)  penalties provided in Section 59-1-401; and

(2)  interest provided in Section 59-1-402.

